Utah statutes.
76-8-108.   Alteration of enrolled legislative bill or resolution.

Every person who fraudulently alters the enrolled copy of any bill or resolution which has been passed or adopted by the Legislature with intent to procure it to be approved by the governor or certified by the Division of Archives, or printed or published by the printer of statutes in language different from that in which it was passed or adopted by the Legislature, is guilty of a felony of the third degree.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1985 General Session

